Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4311
(UDTA 11) No duty to monitor, inform, or advise.

(UDTA 11) (a) Unless the terms of a trust provide otherwise:

(1) a trustee does not have a duty to:

(A) monitor a trust director; or

(B) inform or give advice to a settlor, beneficiary, trustee, or trust director concerning an instance in which the trustee might have acted differently than the director; and

(2) by taking an action described in subdivision (a)(1) of this section, a trustee does not assume the duty excluded by such subdivision.

(b) Unless the terms of a trust provide otherwise:

(1) a trust director does not have a duty to:

(A) monitor a trustee or another trust director; or

(B) inform or give advice to a settlor, beneficiary, trustee, or another trust director concerning an instance in which the director might have acted differently than a trustee or another trust director; and

(2) by taking an action described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section, a trust director does not assume the duty excluded by such subdivision.

Laws 2019, LB536, § 11.